District of Columbia statutes.
31-3708

Filing requirements for advertising.

(a)

The Mayor shall establish, by rule, standards for advertising Medicare supplement insurance and benefits in the District.

(b)

Each insurer, health care service plan, or other entity that provides Medicare supplement insurance or benefits in the District shall provide the Mayor, for review, a copy of any Medicare supplement advertisement intended for use in the District.

Oct. 1, 1992, D.C. Law 9-170, § 9, 39 DCR 5825

History

1981 Ed., § 35-2618.

Prior Codifications

See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-3701.

Temporary Addition of Section